test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sueqkkj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sueʹǩǩ: # Noun a-stem 'birch/koivu' - full paradigm
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: sueʹǩǩ
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: sueʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: sueʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: suäkka
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: sueʹjjest
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: sueʹjjin
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Ess: sueʹǩǩen
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Par: sueʹjjed
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: [sueʹjjtaa, sueʹjjtää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: sueʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: sueʹjji
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: sueʹjjid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: sueʹjjid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: sueʹjjin
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: sueʹjjivuiʹm
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: [sueʹjjitaa, sueʹjjitää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: suäǥǥaž
